Tennessee statutes. Title 4 State Government
Chapter 2

Boundaries

4-2-101. North Carolina boundary.

The boundaries of this state, as defined by the cession act of North Carolina, and embodied in the Constitutions of 1796, of 1834 and of 1870, article I, § 31, are as follows: Beginning on the extreme height of the Stone Mountain, at the place where the line of Virginia intersects it, in latitude thirty-six degrees and thirty minutes (36° 30') north; running thence along the extreme height of that mountain to the place where the Watauga River breaks through it; thence, a direct course, to the top of the Yellow Mountain, where Bright's Road crosses it; thence along the ridge of that mountain, between the waters of Doe River and the waters of Rock Creek, to the place where the road crosses the Iron Mountain; from thence along the extreme height of that mountain to the place where the Nolichucky River runs through it; thence to the top of the Bald Mountain; thence along the extreme height of that mountain to the Painted Rock, on French Broad River; thence along the highest ridge of that mountain to the place where it is called the Great Iron or Smoky Mountain; thence along the extreme height of that mountain to the place where it is called Unicoi or Unaka Mountain, between the Indian towns of Cowee and Old Chota; thence along the main ridge of that mountain to the southern boundary of North Carolina, including all the territory, lands and waters lying west of that line, and contained within the chartered limits of the state of North Carolina before the cession.

Code 1858, § 60; Shan., § 71; Code 1932, § 82; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 4-201.

Cross-References. Acts fixing boundaries left unrepealed, §1-2-105.

Boundaries of state, Tenn. Const., art. I, § 31.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 5 Tenn. Juris., Boundaries, § 1.

4-2-102. Commissioners' North Carolina boundary.

The boundary line between this state and the state of North Carolina, as run by commissioners appointed for the purpose of running and marking the same, begins at a stone set up on the north side of Cataloochee Turnpike Road, and marked on the west side, “Ten., 1821,” and on the east side, “N.C., 1821”; running thence in a southwestwardly course to the Bald Rock, on the summit of the Great Iron or Smoky Mountain, and continuing southwestwardly on the extreme height thereof to where it strikes Tennessee River, about seven (7) miles above the old Indian town of Tallassee, crossing Porter's Gap at the distance of twenty-two (22) miles from the beginning, passing Meigs' boundary line at thirty-one and one-half (31 ½) miles, the Equovettly path at fifty-three (53) miles and crossing Tennessee River at the distance of sixty-five (65) miles from the beginning; from Tennessee River to the main ridge, and along the extreme height of the same to the place where it is called Unicoi or Unaka Mountain, striking the old trading path leading from the Valley Towns to the Overhills Towns, near the head of the west fork of Tellico River, and at the distance of ninety-three (93) miles from the beginning; thence along the extreme height of Unicoi or Unaka Mountain to the southwest end thereof, at the Unicoi or Unaka Turnpike Road, where a cornerstone is set up, marked “Ten.” on the west side and “N.C.” on the east side, and where a hickory tree is also marked on the south side, “Ten. 101 M.,” and on the north side, “N.C. 101 M.,” being one hundred one (101) miles from the beginning; from thence a due course south two (2) miles and two hundred fifty-two (252) poles to a spruce pine on the north bank of the Hiwassee River below the mouth of Cane Creek; thence up that river the same course about one (1) mile, and crossing the same to a maple, marked “W.D.” and “R.A.,” on the south bank of the river; thence continuing the same course due south eleven (11) miles and two hundred seventy-three (273) poles to the southern boundary of the states of Tennessee and North Carolina, making in all one hundred sixteen (116) miles and two hundred twenty-three (223) poles from the beginning, and striking the southern boundary line twenty-three (23) poles west of a tree in that line, marked “72 M.,” where was set up by the commissioners a square post, marked on the west side “Ten., 1821,” and on the east side, “N.C., 1821,” and on the south, “G.”

Code 1858, § 61 (deriv. Acts 1821, ch. 35); Shan., § 72; Code 1932, § 83; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 4-202.

Compiler's Notes. The North Carolina commissioners in 1799 began at the Virginia line and ran the boundary line to the top of a high pinnacle of the Smoky Mountain beyond the French Broad River, where they stopped. The joint commissioners of North Carolina and Tennessee in 1821 began at the termination of the line run by the North Carolina commissioners and surveyed to the Georgia line. See McCarty v. Carolina Lumber Co., 134 Tenn. 35, 182 S.W. 909, 1915 Tenn. LEXIS 146 (1915).

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 5 Tenn. Juris., Boundaries, § 1; 22 Tenn. Juris., State, § 4.

4-2-103. Virginia boundary.

The boundary line between this state and the state of Virginia begins on the summit of the White Top Mountain, at the termination of the northeast corner of this state, running thence a due west course to the top of the Cumberland Mountain, where the southwestern corner of the state of Virginia terminates, equidistant from the lines called Walker's and Henderson's.

Code 1858, § 62 (deriv. Acts 1803, ch. 58, § 1); Acts 1889, ch. 222, § 1; Shan., § 73; Code 1932, § 84; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 4-203.

Compiler's Notes. Walker's line is one run by Virginia commissioners in 1780, and Henderson's line is one run by North Carolina commissioners in what is now Tennessee in pursuance of Acts 1779 (Apr.), ch. 16. These two lines resulted from the disagreement of the commissioners representing the respective states, and are about two miles apart. See Parker v. Claiborne, 32 Tenn. 565 (1852).

By compact between Virginia and Tennessee, it was agreed that a line equally distant from Walker's line and Henderson's line should be the true boundary line between them, which line was run and marked in pursuance of statutes of each state in 1802 and confirmed by Acts 1803, ch. 58. See Campbell v. Crockett, 16 Tenn. 225 (1835); Lessee of Brock v. Burchett, 32 Tenn. 27 (1852); Parker v. Claiborne, 32 Tenn. 565 (1852); Sharp v. Van Winkle, 80 Tenn. 15 (1883).

Acts 1901, ch. 85 ceded a narrow strip of land within the city of Bristol to the state of Virginia.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 5 Tenn. Juris., Boundaries, § 1; 22 Juris., State, § 4.

4-2-104. Kentucky boundary.

The boundary line between this state and the state of Kentucky, as run by commissioners for this state and the state of Kentucky, appointed for the purpose of running and marking the same, runs as is set forth in detail in Acts 1821, chapter 44; 1857-1858, chapter 26; 1859-1860, chapter 79.

All the intervening marks and monuments made and set up by duly authorized boundary commissioners heretofore or hereafter appointed shall be the only lawful boundary between this state and the state of Kentucky, and all the lands lying and inhabitants residing south of that boundary line are, and shall be, subject to the laws and jurisdiction of this state.

It is a Class C misdemeanor to alter, deface, disfigure, change, remove or destroy any of these marks or monuments.

Land titles shall not be affected in any manner by the establishment of the state line described as the boundary between the two (2) states.

Acts 1859-1860, ch. 79, §§ 2-5; Shan., §§ 74-77; Code 1932, §§ 85-88; mod. C. Supp. 1950, § 86; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 4-204; Acts 1989, ch. 591, § 113.

Cross-References. Penalty for Class C misdemeanor, §40-35-111.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 5 Tenn. Juris., Boundaries, § 1; 22 Tenn. Juris., State, § 4.

4-2-105. Georgia boundary.

The boundary line between this state and the state of Georgia begins at a point in the true parallel of the thirty-fifth degree of north latitude, as found by James Carmack, mathematician on the part of the state of Georgia, and James S. Gaines, mathematician on the part of this state, on a rock about two feet (2') high, four inches (4") thick, and fifteen inches (15") broad, engraved on the north side thus: “June 1st, 1818, Var. 6¾ East,” and on the south side thus: “Geo. 35 North, J. Carmack,” which rock stands one (1) mile and twenty-eight (28) poles from the south bank of the Tennessee River, due south from near the center of the old Indian town of Nick-a-Jack, and near the top of the Nick-a-Jack Mountain at the supposed corner of the states of Georgia and Alabama; thence running due east, leaving old D. Ross two (2) miles and eighteen (18) yards in this state, and leaving the house of John Ross about two hundred (200) yards in the state of Georgia, and the house of David McNair one (1) mile and one-fourth (¼) of a mile in this state, with blazed and mile-marked trees, lessening the variation of the compass by degrees, closing it at the termination of the line on the top of the Unicoi Mountain at five and one-half degrees (5½°).

Code 1858, § 67; Shan., § 78; Code 1932, § 89; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 4-205.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 5 Tenn. Juris., Boundaries, § 1.

Law Reviews.

Crossing the Line: Does the Georgia Plan to Redraw the Tennessee-Georgia Border Pass Legal Muster? (Crews Townsend, Zachary H. Greene, Alison Martin, Robert F. Parsley and Joseph Y. McCoin III), 44 Tenn. B.J. 14 (2008).

4-2-106. Mississippi boundary.

The boundary line between this state and the state of Mississippi begins at a point on the west bank of the Tennessee River, six (6) four-pole chains south or above the mouth of Yellow Creek, and about three-quarters (¾) of a mile north of the line known as Thompson's line, and twenty-six (26) chains and ten (10) links north of Thompson's line, at the basis meridian of the Chickasaw surveys, and terminating at a point on the east bank of the Mississippi River, opposite Cow Island, sixteen (16) chains north of Thompson's line, being the line marked by commissioners appointed for the two (2) states, as the thirty-fifth degree of north latitude.

Code 1858, § 68 (deriv. Acts 1837-1838, ch. 7); Shan., § 79; Code 1932, § 90; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 4-206.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 5 Tenn. Juris., Boundaries, § 1.

4-2-107. Missouri and Arkansas boundaries.

The western boundary of this state is the middle of the stream of the Mississippi River, including within this state all such islands as are held under grants from the states of Tennessee and North Carolina.

Code 1858, § 69; Shan., § 80; Code 1932, § 91; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 4-207.

Cross-References. Criminal jurisdiction over Mississippi River, §§4-1-103,4-1-104.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 5 Tenn. Juris., Boundaries, § 1; 22 Tenn. Juris., State, § 4.